Utah statutes.
76-1-402.   Separate offenses arising out of single criminal episode --
Included offenses.
(1) A defendant may be prosecuted in a single criminal action for all separate
offenses arising out of a single criminal episode; however, when the same act
of a defendant under a single criminal episode shall establish offenses which
may be punished in different ways under different provisions of this code, the
act shall be punishable under only one such provision; an acquittal or
conviction and sentence under any such provision bars a prosecution under any
other such provision.
(2)  Whenever conduct may establish separate offenses under a single criminal
episode, unless the court otherwise orders to promote justice, a defendant
shall not be subject to separate trials for multiple offenses when:
(a)  The offenses are within the jurisdiction of a single court; and
(b)  The offenses are known to the prosecuting attorney at the time the
defendant is arraigned on the first information or indictment.
(3)  A defendant may be convicted of an offense included in the offense
charged but may not be convicted of both the offense charged and the included
offense. An offense is so included when:
(a)  It is established by proof of the same or less than all the facts
required to establish the commission of the offense charged; or
(b)  It constitutes an attempt, solicitation, conspiracy, or form of
preparation to commit the offense charged or an offense otherwise included
therein; or
(c)  It is specifically designated by a statute as a lesser included offense.
(4)  The court shall not be obligated to charge the jury with respect to an
included offense unless there is a rational basis for a verdict acquitting the
defendant of the offense charged and convicting him of the included offense.
(5)  If the district court on motion after verdict or judgment, or an
appellate court on appeal or certiorari, shall determine that there is
insufficient evidence to support a conviction for the offense charged but that
there is sufficient evidence to support a conviction for an included offense
and the trier of fact necessarily found every fact required for conviction of
that included offense, the verdict or judgment of conviction may be set aside
or reversed and a judgment of conviction entered for the included offense,
without necessity of a new trial, if such relief is sought by the defendant.
